Idaho, session 2026, H0544.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 46-216, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
46-216. LEAVE OF ABSENCE FROM REGULAR DUTIES FOR MILITARY DUTY. All
officers and employees of the state of Idaho who shall be are current mem-
bers of the national guard or who shall be are current reservists in the armed
forces of the United States, shall be entitled each calendar year to one hun-
dred twenty (120) one hundred sixty (160) hours of military leave of absence
from their respective duties without loss of pay, time, or efficiency rat-
ing during which they shall be engaged in military duty ordered or authorized
under the provisions of law. State employees assigned to "uncommon tours of
duty" shall have the above-referenced one hundred twenty (120) one hundred
sixty (160) hours of leave prorated proportionally to the number of hours in
their regularly scheduled biweekly pay period. Administration of paid leave
for "uncommon tours of duty" military duty shall be consistent with the fed-
eral office of personnel management (OPM) definitions and pay administra-
tion guidance for similarly situated federal employees.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.